dictsource/quc_rules
.replace
        // replace to standard writing
        ’       '
        á       a
        ä       a
        é       e
        ë       e
        í       i
        ï       i
        ó       o
        ö       o
        ú       u
        ü       u

.group a
        a       a

.group ä
        ä       a

.group b
        b       b
        b'      ?b

.group ch
        ch      tS
        ch'     ?tS

.group e
        e       e

.group ë
        ë       e

.group i
        i       i

.group ï
        ï       i

.group j
        j       h

.group k
        k       k
        k'      ?k

.group l
        l       l

.group m
        m       m

.group n
        n       n

.group o
        o       ou

.group ö
        ö       ou

.group p
        p       p

.group q
        q       q
        q'      ?q

.group r
        r       R

.group s
        s       s

.group t
        t       t
        t'      ?t

.group tz
        tz      ts
        tz'     ?tz

.group u
        u       u:

.group ü
        ü       u

.group w
        w       v

.group x
        x       S

.group y
        y (A    j
        y (C    i
        y (_    i

.group '
        '       ?
